Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 2. ESTATES OF DECEDENTS; DURABLE POWERS OF ATTORNEY

SUBTITLE A. SCOPE, JURISDICTION, VENUE, AND COURTS

CHAPTER 34. MATTERS RELATING TO CERTAIN OTHER TYPES OF PROCEEDINGS

Sec. 34.001. TRANSFER TO STATUTORY PROBATE COURT OF PROCEEDING RELATED TO PROBATE PROCEEDING. (a) A judge of a statutory probate court, on the motion of a party to the action or on the motion of a person interested in an estate, may transfer to the judge's court from a district, county, or statutory court a cause of action related to a probate proceeding pending in the statutory probate court or a cause of action in which a personal representative of an estate pending in the statutory probate court is a party and may consolidate the transferred cause of action with the other proceedings in the statutory probate court relating to that estate.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subtitle, Title 1, Chapter 51, 52, 53, 54, 55, or 151, or Section 351.001, 351.002, 351.053, 351.352, 351.353, 351.354, or 351.355, the proper venue for an action by or against a personal representative for personal injury, death, or property damages is determined under Section 15.007, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 5228, ch. 958, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1983. Amended by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1431, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 204, Sec. 3.06, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1351 (S.B. 408), Sec. 12(c), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1338 (S.B. 1198), Sec. 1.03, eff. January 1, 2014.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Probate Code, Art/Sec 5B by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.009, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1236 (S.B. 1296), Sec. 20.006, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 34.002. ACTIONS TO COLLECT DELINQUENT PROPERTY TAXES. (a) This section applies only to a decedent's estate that:

(1) is being administered in a pending probate proceeding;

(2) owns or claims an interest in property against which a taxing unit has imposed ad valorem taxes that are delinquent; and

(3) is not being administered as an independent administration under Chapter 401 and Section 402.001.

(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, if the probate proceedings are pending in a foreign jurisdiction or in a county other than the county in which the taxes were imposed, a suit to foreclose the lien securing payment of the taxes or to enforce personal liability for the taxes must be brought under Section 33.41, Tax Code, in a court of competent jurisdiction in the county in which the taxes were imposed.

(c) If the probate proceedings have been pending for four years or less in the county in which the taxes were imposed, the taxing unit may present a claim for the delinquent taxes against the estate to the personal representative of the estate in the probate proceedings.

(d) If the taxing unit presents a claim against the estate under Subsection (c):

(1) the claim of the taxing unit is subject to each applicable provision in Subchapter A, Chapter 124, Subchapter B, Chapter 308, Subchapter F, Chapter 351, and Chapters 355 and 356 that relates to a claim or the enforcement of a claim in a probate proceeding; and

(2) the taxing unit may not bring a suit in any other court to foreclose the lien securing payment of the taxes or to enforce personal liability for the delinquent taxes before the first day after the fourth anniversary of the date the application for the probate proceeding was filed.

(e) To foreclose the lien securing payment of the delinquent taxes, the taxing unit must bring a suit under Section 33.41, Tax Code, in a court of competent jurisdiction for the county in which the taxes were imposed if:

(1) the probate proceedings have been pending in that county for more than four years; and

(2) the taxing unit did not present a delinquent tax claim under Subsection (c) against the estate in the probate proceeding.

(f) In a suit brought under Subsection (e), the taxing unit:

(1) shall make the personal representative of the decedent's estate a party to the suit; and

(2) may not seek to enforce personal liability for the taxes against the estate of the decedent.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1481, Sec. 36, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Transferred, redesignated and amended from Probate Code, Art/Sec 5C by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 6.009, eff. January 1, 2014.